Massachusetts, session 194th, H1058.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Executive Office of
Energy and Environmental Affairs shall provide authorization that cranberry water use
registrations and permits issued pursuant to M.G.L. Chapter 21G can be used for mitigation by
other municipal permitted or registered users within the same watershed, provided that users
obtain the appropriate registrations and permits issued pursuant to M.G.L. Chapter 21G for the
new water use.
of 1